Utah statutes.
73-3a-106.   Application form.

Applications for appropriations or changes referred to in Section 73-3a-103 must:

(1)  be made upon forms furnished by the state engineer; and

(2)  set forth:

(a)  the name of the applicant;

(b)  the description of the water right, if applicable;

(c)  the quantity of water;

(d)  the stream or source;

(e)  the point on the stream or source where the water is diverted;

(f)  the point to which it is proposed to change the diversion of the water, if applicable;

(g)  the place, purpose, and extent of the present use, if applicable;

(h)  the place, purpose, and extent of the proposed use;

(i)  an agent in the state of Utah designated for reception of service of process and other legal notices; and

(j)  any other information that the state engineer requires.

